Tennessee, session 114, HB0631.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 4, Chapter 32, is amended by adding
the following as a new section:
(a) The office shall establish a grant program for the purpose of supporting and
funding nonprofit and faith-based child care programs for children four (4) years of age
and younger.
(b) Subject to appropriations, at least one-third (1/3) of funds appropriated to the
office each year must be allocated and disbursed as grants in accordance with this
section.
(c)
(1) To qualify and receive grant funds, a nonprofit or faith-based child
care program must:
(A) Be licensed and qualified in accordance with title 71, chapter
3, part 5, as a child care agency;
(B) Be in good standing with the department of human services;
and
(C) Operate on an income-based pricing model in which a family
is charged not more than seven percent (7%) of their household income
for child care.
HB0631
002027
- 1 -

(2) Priority for grants must be given to applicants located in a child care
desert. For purposes of this subdivision (c)(2), "child care desert" means a
census tract where there are more than fifty (50) children younger than five (5)
years of age and the tract either does not contain a licensed child care agency or
has a ratio of at least three (3) children in such age group per licensed child care
agency slot.
(d) The executive director of the office shall oversee the grant application
process and program. Not later than March 1 annually, the executive director shall
report to the general assembly and the office of legislative budget analysis on the
availability of grant funds and the use and recipients of such funds disbursed in
accordance with this section.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect July 1, 2025, the public welfare requiring it.
- 2 - 002027